Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 468B.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, and unless prohib-
ited by federal law, the Environmental Quality Commission and the Department  of Environ-
mental Quality may, in a permit applicable to a seafood processing facility for the discharge
of wastewater effluent into the waters of the state, allow a portion of the water body  re-
ceiving the  wastewater effluent to serve as a mixing zone in order to satisfy the bacteria
water quality criteria for the water body if the department determines that the  mixing zone
would not  adversely affect public health. The department’s determination must be based on
a review of  information that clearly demonstrates that the mixing zone would not adversely
affect public health.
(2) A seafood  processing facility subject to a permit described in subsection (1) of this
section shall implement best management practices  to prevent the inclusion of bacteria in
wastewater effluent from external fecal  sources. Best management practices must be in-
formed by a site-specific investigation of sources of bacteria.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3814 (HB 3814-B) Page 1
Passed by House April 10, 2025
Repassed by House May 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3814 (HB 3814-B) Page 2